Wyoming, session 2025, HB0329.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-616(a) and 19-13-105(c)(iv) and
by creating a new subsection (e) are amended to read:

HB0329

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0764
9-1-616. Cooperation with other law enforcement
agencies and the office of homeland security; concurrent
jurisdiction.

(a) The division shall cooperate with the Wyoming
office of homeland security, federal, state, tribal and
local law enforcement agencies and officers for the
efficient investigation of criminal activity and swift
apprehension of persons suspected of violating the criminal
laws of this state.

19-13-105. Homeland security program.

(c) The director is the administrative head of the
Wyoming office of homeland security. In addition to the
duties described in W.S. 19-13-104(d) the director:

(iv) Shall May maintain liaison with and
cooperate with homeland security agencies and programs of
other states and of the federal government;

(e) The office of homeland security may receive
criminal identification, intelligence and criminal history
HB0329

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0764
information available to law enforcement agencies for the
purposes provided by W.S. 19-13-103.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0329